Indiana, session 2026, HB1300.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-8-8.5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2024,
SECTION 10 AND P.L.136-2024, SECTION 56, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. A
member who elects to enter the DROP shall do the following:
(1) Agree to the following:
(A) Except as provided in clause (F), the member shall
execute an irrevocable election to retire on the DROP
retirement date and shall remain in active service until that
date.
(B) While in the DROP, the member shall continue to make
contributions to the applicable fund under the provisions of
that fund.
(C) The member shall elect a DROP retirement date not less
than twelve (12) months and not more than:
(i) thirty-six (36) months after the member's DROP entry
date, for a member who executes an election described in
clause (A) before July 1, 2024; or
2026 IN 1300—LS 6329/DI 153


(ii) sixty (60) months after the member's DROP entry date,
for a member who executes an election described in clause
(A) after June 30, 2024.
(D) The member may not remain in the DROP after the date
the member reaches any mandatory retirement age that may
apply to the member.
(E) Except as provided in clause (F), the member may make
an election to enter the DROP only once in the member's
lifetime.
(F) The member may:
(i) withdraw from the DROP before the DROP
retirement date; and
(ii) make an election to enter the DROP for a second time
not earlier than three (3) years after the date the
member withdrew from the DROP.
(2) Notify the member's employer of the DROP election within
thirty (30) days of the election.
SECTION 2. IC 36-8-8.5-10.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.129-2024,
SECTION 11 AND P.L.136-2024, SECTION 57, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a)
Notwithstanding section 10 of this chapter, a member that entered the
DROP before July 1, 2024, and that has not exited or withdrawn from
the DROP may elect to extend the member's DROP retirement date up
to sixty (60) months after the member's DROP entry date.
(b) A member that makes the election described in subsection (a)
shall notify the member's employer within thirty (30) days of the
election.
SECTION 3. IC 36-8-8.5-10.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.7. If a member makes an
election to enter the DROP for a second time as set forth in section
10(1)(F) of this chapter, the:
(1) DROP entry date; and
(2) DROP retirement date;
are based on the member's most recent DROP election.
SECTION 4. IC 36-8-8.5-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2024,
SECTION 12 AND P.L.136-2024, SECTION 58, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a)
Subject to subsection (b), a member who enters the DROP established
by this chapter shall exit the DROP at the earliest of:
(1) the member's DROP retirement date;
(2) either:
2026 IN 1300—LS 6329/DI 153


(A) thirty-six (36) months after the member's DROP entry
date, if the member:
(i) executes an election described in section 10 of this
chapter before July 1, 2024; and
(ii) does not execute an extension described in section 10.5
of this chapter; or
(B) sixty (60) months after the member's DROP entry date, if
the member:
(i) executes an election described in section 10 of this
chapter after June 30, 2024; or
(ii) executes an extension described in section 10.5 of this
chapter;
(3) the mandatory retirement age applicable to the member, if
any; or
(4) the date the member retires because of a disability as provided
under section 16.5(d) of this chapter; or
(5) the date the member withdraws from the DROP under
section 10(1)(F) of this chapter.
(b) A member of the 1925 fund, the 1937 fund, or the 1953 fund
who enters the DROP established by this chapter must exit the DROP
on the date the authority of the board of trustees of the Indiana public
retirement system to distribute from the pension relief fund established
under IC 5-10.3-11-1 to units of local government (described in
IC 5-10.3-11-3) amounts determined under IC 5-10.3-11-4.7 expires.
2026 IN 1300—LS 6329/DI 153